Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.920

Construction—1959 c 5—Benefits retroactively authorized.

The provisions of chapter 5, Laws of 1959 are intended to be remedial and procedural and any benefits heretofore paid to recipients hereunder pursuant to any previous act are retroactively included and authorized as a part of chapter 5, Laws of 1959.

[ 1959 c 5 s 14.]